Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.155

Regional committees—Members' expenses reimbursed.

Members of each regional committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

[ 1985 c 385 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 118; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.035. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-30, part; prior: 1941 c 248 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4709-3, part. Formerly RCW 28A.315.090, 28A.57.035, 28.57.030, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.